Iowa, session 2025-2026, HSB341.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF THE STATE OF IOWA: 13 TLSB 1000YC (7) 91 sc/ns H.F. _____ DIVISION I 1 FY 2025-2026 APPROPRIATIONS 2 Section 1. DEPARTMENT OF ADMINISTRATIVE SERVICES. 3 1. There is appropriated from the general fund of the state 4 to the department of administrative services for the fiscal 5 year beginning July 1, 2025, and ending June 30, 2026, the 6 following amounts, or so much thereof as is necessary, to be 7 used for the purposes designated: 8 a. For salaries, support, maintenance, and miscellaneous 9 purposes, and for not more than the following full-time 10 equivalent positions: 11 . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . $ 3,713,718 12 . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . FTEs 55.30 13 b. For the payment of utility costs, and for not more than 14 the following full-time equivalent positions: 15 . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . $ 4,487,598 16 . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . FTEs 1.00 17 Notwithstanding section 8.33 , moneys appropriated 18 for utility costs in this lettered paragraph that remain 19 unencumbered or unobligated at the close of the fiscal year 20 shall not revert but shall remain available for expenditure 21 for the purposes designated until the close of the succeeding 22 fiscal year. 23 c. For Terrace Hill operations, and for not more than the 24 following full-time equivalent positions: 25 . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . $ 547,384 26 . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . FTEs 4.37 27 d. For state library services: 28 (1) For salaries, support, maintenance, and miscellaneous 29 purposes, and for not more than the following full-time 30 equivalent positions: 31 . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . $ 2,626,613 32 . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . FTEs 19.00 33 (2) For the enrich Iowa program established under section 34 8A.209: 35 -1- LSB 1000YC (7) 91 sc/ns 1/ 20 H.F. _____ . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . $ 2,464,823 1 e. (1) For support of the stateâs historical resources, and 2 for not more than the following full-time equivalent positions: 3 . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . $ 4,304,774 4 . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . FTEs 37.99 5 (2) The department shall coordinate historical and cultural 6 activities with the tourism office of the economic development 7 authority to promote attendance at the state historical 8 building and at the stateâs historic sites. 9 f. For administration and support of the stateâs historic 10 sites, and for not more than the following full-time equivalent 11 positions: 12 . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . $ 425,751 13 . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . FTEs 2.81 14 2. Any moneys and premiums collected by the department 15 for workersâ compensation shall be segregated into a separate 16 workersâ compensation fund in the state treasury to be used 17 for payment of state employeesâ workersâ compensation claims 18 and administrative costs. Notwithstanding section 8.33 , 19 unencumbered or unobligated moneys remaining in this workersâ 20 compensation fund at the end of the fiscal year shall not 21 revert but shall remain available for expenditure for purposes 22 of the fund in subsequent fiscal years. 23 Sec. 2. DEPARTMENT OF ADMINISTRATIVE SERVICES ââ 24 REVOLVING FUNDS. There is appropriated to the department of 25 administrative services for the fiscal year beginning July 26 1, 2025, and ending June 30, 2026, from the revolving funds 27 designated in chapter 8A and from internal service funds 28 created by the department such amounts as the department deems 29 necessary for the operation of the department consistent with 30 the requirements of chapter 8A . 31 Sec. 3. DEPARTMENT OF ADMINISTRATIVE SERVICES ââ STATE 32 EMPLOYEE HEALTH INSURANCE ADMINISTRATION CHARGE. For the 33 fiscal year beginning July 1, 2025, and ending June 30, 2026, 34 the monthly per contract administrative charge which may be 35 -2- LSB 1000YC (7) 91 sc/ns 2/ 20 H.F. _____ assessed by the department of administrative services shall be 1 $2.00 per contract on all health insurance plans administered 2 by the department. 3 Sec. 4. AUDITOR OF STATE. 4 1. There is appropriated from the general fund of the state 5 to the office of the auditor of state for the fiscal year 6 beginning July 1, 2025, and ending June 30, 2026, the following 7 amounts, or so much thereof as is necessary, to be used for the 8 purposes designated: 9 For salaries, support, maintenance, and miscellaneous 10 purposes, and for not more than the following full-time 11 equivalent positions: 12 . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . $ 1,002,686 13 . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . FTEs 100.00 14 2. The auditor of state may retain additional full-time 15 equivalent positions as is reasonable and necessary to 16 perform governmental subdivision audits which are reimbursable 17 pursuant to section 11.20 or 11.21 , to perform audits which are 18 requested by and reimbursable from the federal government, and 19 to perform work requested by and reimbursable from departments 20 or agencies pursuant to section 11.5A or 11.5B . The auditor 21 of state shall notify the department of management, the 22 legislative fiscal committee, and the legislative services 23 agency of the additional full-time equivalent positions 24 retained. 25 3. The auditor of state shall allocate moneys from the 26 appropriations in this section solely for audit work related to 27 the annual comprehensive financial report, federally required 28 audits, and investigations of embezzlement, theft, or other 29 significant financial irregularities until the audit of the 30 annual comprehensive financial report is complete. 31 Sec. 5. IOWA ETHICS AND CAMPAIGN DISCLOSURE BOARD. There 32 is appropriated from the general fund of the state to the 33 Iowa ethics and campaign disclosure board for the fiscal year 34 beginning July 1, 2025, and ending June 30, 2026, the following 35 -3- LSB 1000YC (7) 91 sc/ns 3/ 20 H.F. _____ amount, or so much thereof as is necessary, to be used for the 1 purposes designated: 2 For salaries, support, maintenance, and miscellaneous 3 purposes, and for not more than the following full-time 4 equivalent positions: 5 . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . $ 1,045,432 6 . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . FTEs 8.00 7 Sec. 6. GOVERNOR AND LIEUTENANT GOVERNOR. There is 8 appropriated from the general fund of the state to the offices 9 of the governor and the lieutenant governor for the fiscal year 10 beginning July 1, 2025, and ending June 30, 2026, the following 11 amounts, or so much thereof as is necessary, to be used for the 12 purposes designated: 13 1. GENERAL OFFICE 14 For salaries, support, maintenance, and miscellaneous 15 purposes, and for not more than the following full-time 16 equivalent positions: 17 . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . $ 2,864,932 18 . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . FTEs 25.00 19 2. TERRACE HILL QUARTERS 20 For the governorâs quarters at Terrace Hill, including 21 salaries, support, maintenance, and miscellaneous purposes, and 22 for not more than the following full-time equivalent positions: 23 . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . $ 144,222 24 . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . FTEs 1.93 25 Sec. 7. DEPARTMENT OF INSPECTIONS, APPEALS, AND 26 LICENSING. There is appropriated from the general fund of the 27 state to the department of inspections, appeals, and licensing 28 for the fiscal year beginning July 1, 2025, and ending June 29 30, 2026, the following amounts, or so much thereof as is 30 necessary, to be used for the purposes designated: 31 1. ADMINISTRATION DIVISION 32 For salaries, support, maintenance, and miscellaneous 33 purposes, and for not more than the following full-time 34 equivalent positions: 35 -4- LSB 1000YC (7) 91 sc/ns 4/ 20 H.F. _____ . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . $ 933,285 1 . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . FTEs 11.55 2 2. ADMINISTRATIVE HEARINGS DIVISION 3 For salaries, support, maintenance, and miscellaneous 4 purposes, and for not more than the following full-time 5 equivalent positions: 6 . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . $ 654,983 7 . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . FTEs 23.00 8 3. INVESTIGATIONS 9 a. For salaries, support, maintenance, and miscellaneous 10 purposes, and for not more than the following full-time 11 equivalent positions: 12 . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . $ 2,769,231 13 . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . FTEs 56.00 14 b. By December 1, 2025, the department shall submit a 15 report to the general assembly concerning the departmentâs 16 activities relative to fraud in public assistance programs 17 for the fiscal year beginning July 1, 2024, and ending June 18 30, 2025. The report shall include but is not limited to a 19 summary of the number of cases investigated, case outcomes, 20 overpayment dollars identified, amount of cost avoidance, and 21 actual dollars recovered. 22 4. HEALTH FACILITIES 23 a. For salaries, support, maintenance, and miscellaneous 24 purposes, and for not more than the following full-time 25 equivalent positions: 26 . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . $ 6,206,128 27 . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . FTEs 132.00 28 b. The department shall make all of the following 29 information available to the public as part of the departmentâs 30 development efforts to revise the departmentâs internet site: 31 (1) The number of inspections of health facilities 32 conducted by the department annually by type of service 33 provider and type of inspection. 34 (2) The total annual operations budget for the department 35 -5- LSB 1000YC (7) 91 sc/ns 5/ 20 H.F. _____ that is associated with health facilities regulation, including 1 general fund appropriations and federal contract dollars 2 received by type of service provider inspected. 3 (3) The total number of full-time equivalent positions 4 in the department that are associated with health facilities 5 regulation, to include the number of full-time equivalent 6 positions serving in a supervisory capacity, and serving as 7 surveyors, inspectors, or monitors in the field by type of 8 service provider inspected. 9 (4) Identification of state and federal survey trends, 10 cited regulations, the scope and severity of deficiencies 11 identified, and federal and state fines assessed and collected 12 concerning nursing and assisted living facilities and programs. 13 c. It is the intent of the general assembly that the 14 department continuously solicit input from health facilities 15 regulated by the department to assess and improve the 16 departmentâs level of collaboration and to identify new 17 opportunities for cooperation. 18 5. EMPLOYMENT APPEAL BOARD 19 a. For salaries, support, maintenance, and miscellaneous 20 purposes, and for not more than the following full-time 21 equivalent positions: 22 . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . $ 530,782 23 . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . FTEs 11.00 24 b. The employment appeal board shall be reimbursed by the 25 department for all costs associated with hearings conducted 26 under chapter 91C related to contractor registration. The 27 board may expend, in addition to the amount appropriated under 28 this subsection, additional amounts as are directly billable 29 to the department under this subsection and to retain the 30 additional full-time equivalent positions as needed to conduct 31 hearings required pursuant to chapter 91C . 32 c. The employment appeal board may temporarily exceed and 33 draw more than the amount appropriated in this subsection and 34 incur a negative cash balance as long as there are receivables 35 -6- LSB 1000YC (7) 91 sc/ns 6/ 20 H.F. _____ of federal funds equal to or greater than the negative balance 1 and the amount appropriated in this subsection is not exceeded 2 at the close of the fiscal year. 3 6. FOOD AND CONSUMER SAFETY 4 For salaries, support, maintenance, and miscellaneous 5 purposes, and for not more than the following full-time 6 equivalent positions: 7 . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . $ 509,565 8 . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . FTEs 33.75 9 7. IOWA OFFICE OF CIVIL RIGHTS 10 a. For salaries, support, maintenance, and miscellaneous 11 purposes, and for not more than the following full-time 12 equivalent positions: 13 . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . $ 1,385,921 14 . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . FTEs 27.00 15 b. The Iowa office of civil rights may enter into a contract 16 with a nonprofit organization to provide legal assistance to 17 resolve civil rights complaints. 18 8. LABOR SERVICES 19 a. For salaries, support, maintenance, and miscellaneous 20 purposes, and for not more than the following full-time 21 equivalent positions: 22 . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . $ 2,965,719 23 . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . FTEs 50.00 24 b. Notwithstanding section 8.33, moneys appropriated in 25 this subsection that remain unencumbered or unobligated at the 26 close of the fiscal year shall not revert but shall remain 27 available for expenditure for the purposes designated until the 28 close of the succeeding fiscal year. 29 9. DIVISION OF WORKERSâ COMPENSATION 30 a. For salaries, support, maintenance, and miscellaneous 31 purposes, and for not more than the following full-time 32 equivalent positions: 33 . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . $ 3,381,044 34 . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . FTEs 26.10 35 -7- LSB 1000YC (7) 91 sc/ns 7/ 20 H.F. _____ b. Notwithstanding section 8.33, moneys appropriated in 1 this subsection that remain unencumbered or unobligated at the 2 close of the fiscal year shall not revert but shall remain 3 available for expenditure for the purposes designated until the 4 close of the succeeding fiscal year. 5 10. PROFESSIONAL LICENSING 6 For salaries, support, maintenance, and miscellaneous 7 purposes, and for not more than the following full-time 8 equivalent positions: 9 . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . $ 1,627,969 10 . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . FTEs 139.00 11 11. APPROPRIATION REALLOCATION 12 Notwithstanding section 8.39 , the department of inspections, 13 appeals, and licensing, in consultation with the department of 14 management, may reallocate moneys appropriated in this section 15 as necessary to best fulfill the needs of the department 16 of inspections, appeals, and licensing provided for in the 17 appropriation. However, the department of inspections, 18 appeals, and licensing shall not reallocate moneys appropriated 19 for labor services or the division of workersâ compensation. 20 Sec. 8. DEPARTMENT OF INSPECTIONS, APPEALS, AND LICENSING 21 ââ LICENSE OR REGISTRATION FEES. 22 1. For the fiscal year beginning July 1, 2025, and ending 23 June 30, 2026, the department of inspections, appeals, and 24 licensing shall collect any license or registration fees or 25 electronic transaction fees generated during the fiscal year 26 as a result of licensing and registration activities under 27 chapters 99B , 137C , 137D , and 137F . 28 2. From the fees collected by the department under this 29 section on behalf of a municipal corporation with which 30 the department has an agreement pursuant to section 137F.3 , 31 through a statewide electronic licensing system operated by 32 the department, notwithstanding section 137F.6, subsection 2 , 33 the department shall remit the amount of those fees to the 34 municipal corporation for whom the fees were collected less 35 -8- LSB 1000YC (7) 91 sc/ns 8/ 20 H.F. _____ any electronic transaction fees collected by the department to 1 enable electronic payment. 2 3. From the fees collected by the department under this 3 section, other than those fees described in subsection 2, 4 the department shall deposit the amount of $800,000 into the 5 general fund of the state prior to June 30, 2026. 6 4. From the fees collected by the department under this 7 section, other than those fees described in subsections 2 and 8 3, the department shall retain the remainder of the fees for 9 the purposes of enforcing the provisions of chapters 99B , 137C , 10 137D , and 137F . Notwithstanding section 8.33 , moneys retained 11 by the department pursuant to this subsection that remain 12 unencumbered or unobligated at the close of the fiscal year 13 shall not revert but shall remain available for expenditure 14 for the purposes of enforcing the provisions of chapters 99B , 15 137C , 137D , and 137F during the succeeding fiscal year. The 16 department shall provide an annual report to the department 17 of management and the legislative services agency on fees 18 billed and collected and expenditures from the moneys retained 19 by the department in a format determined by the department 20 of management in consultation with the legislative services 21 agency. 22 Sec. 9. DEPARTMENT OF INSPECTIONS, APPEALS, AND LICENSING 23 ââ HOUSING TRUST FUND. There is appropriated from the housing 24 trust fund created in section 16.181 to the department of 25 inspections, appeals, and licensing for the fiscal year 26 beginning July 1, 2025, and ending June 30, 2026, the following 27 amount, or so much thereof as is necessary, to be used for the 28 purposes designated: 29 For professional licensing salaries, support, maintenance, 30 and miscellaneous purposes: 31 . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . $ 62,317 32 Sec. 10. DEPARTMENT OF INSPECTIONS, APPEALS, AND LICENSING 33 ââ RACING AND GAMING COMMISSION ââ RACING AND GAMING 34 REGULATION. There is appropriated from the gaming regulatory 35 -9- LSB 1000YC (7) 91 sc/ns 9/ 20 H.F. _____ revolving fund established in section 99F.20 to the racing and 1 gaming commission of the department of inspections, appeals, 2 and licensing for the fiscal year beginning July 1, 2025, and 3 ending June 30, 2026, the following amount, or so much thereof 4 as is necessary, to be used for the purposes designated: 5 For salaries, support, maintenance, and miscellaneous 6 purposes for regulation, administration, and enforcement of 7 pari-mutuel racetracks, excursion boat gambling, gambling 8 structure laws, sports wagering, and fantasy sports contests, 9 and for not more than the following full-time equivalent 10 positions: 11 . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . $ 7,448,600 12 . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . FTEs 53.70 13 Sec. 11. DEPARTMENT OF INSPECTIONS, APPEALS, AND LICENSING 14 ââ ROAD USE TAX FUND. There is appropriated from the road 15 use tax fund created in section 312.1 to the administrative 16 hearings division of the department of inspections, appeals, 17 and licensing for the fiscal year beginning July 1, 2025, and 18 ending June 30, 2026, the following amount, or so much thereof 19 as is necessary, to be used for the purposes designated: 20 For salaries, support, maintenance, and miscellaneous 21 purposes: 22 . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . $ 1,623,897 23 Sec. 12. DEPARTMENT OF INSURANCE AND FINANCIAL SERVICES 24 ââ COMMERCE REVOLVING FUND. There is appropriated from the 25 commerce revolving fund created in section 546.12 to the 26 department of insurance and financial services for the fiscal 27 year beginning July 1, 2025, and ending June 30, 2026, the 28 following amounts, or so much thereof as is necessary, to be 29 used for the purposes designated: 30 1. BANKING DIVISION 31 For salaries, support, maintenance, and miscellaneous 32 purposes, and for not more than the following full-time 33 equivalent positions: 34 . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . $ 14,343,523 35 -10- LSB 1000YC (7) 91 sc/ns 10/ 20 H.F. _____ . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . FTEs 79.00 1 2. CREDIT UNION DIVISION 2 For salaries, support, maintenance, and miscellaneous 3 purposes, and for not more than the following full-time 4 equivalent positions: 5 . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . $ 2,875,989 6 . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . FTEs 16.00 7 3. INSURANCE DIVISION 8 a. For salaries, support, maintenance, and miscellaneous 9 purposes, and for not more than the following full-time 10 equivalent positions: 11 . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . $ 10,326,541 12 . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . FTEs 131.85 13 b. The insurance division expenditures for examination 14 purposes may exceed the projected receipts, refunds, and 15 reimbursements, estimated pursuant to section 505.7, subsection 16 7, including the expenditures for retention of additional 17 personnel, if the expenditures are fully reimbursable and the 18 division first does all of the following: 19 (1) Notifies the department of management, the legislative 20 services agency, and the legislative fiscal committee of the 21 need for the expenditures. 22 (2) Files with each of the entities named in subparagraph 23 (1) the legislative and regulatory justification for the 24 expenditures, along with an estimate of the expenditures. 25 c. For the review of and report on pharmacy services 26 administrative organizations and the wholesale distribution of 27 prescription drugs, as required by 2025 Iowa Acts, Senate File 28 383, section 10, if enacted: 29 . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . $ 225,000 30 Sec. 13. DEPARTMENT OF INSURANCE AND FINANCIAL SERVICES ââ 31 GENERAL FUND. There is appropriated from the general fund of 32 the state to the department of insurance and financial services 33 for the fiscal year beginning July 1, 2025, and ending June 34 30, 2026, the following amounts, or so much thereof as is 35 -11- LSB 1000YC (7) 91 sc/ns 11/ 20 H.F. _____ necessary, to be used for the purposes designated: 1 For deposit in the captive insurance regulatory and 2 supervision fund created in section 521J.12 for use as provided 3 in section 521J.12, including salaries, support, maintenance, 4 and miscellaneous purposes, and for not more than the following 5 full-time equivalent positions: 6 . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . $ 450,000 7 . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . FTEs 2.00 8 Sec. 14. DEPARTMENT OF MANAGEMENT. There is appropriated 9 from the general fund of the state to the department of 10 management for the fiscal year beginning July 1, 2025, and 11 ending June 30, 2026, the following amounts, or so much thereof 12 as is necessary, to be used for the purposes designated: 13 1. For enterprise resource planning, providing for a 14 salary model administrator, conducting performance audits, the 15 departmentâs LEAN process, and criminal and juvenile justice 16 planning; for salaries, support, maintenance, and miscellaneous 17 purposes; and for not more than the following full-time 18 equivalent positions: 19 . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . $ 3,666,154 20 . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . FTEs 29.00 21 2. For the division of information technology; for 22 salaries, support, maintenance, and miscellaneous purposes; and 23 for not more than the following full-time equivalent positions: 24 . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . $ 4,421,887 25 . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . FTEs 24.39 26 Of the moneys appropriated in this subsection, $325,000 27 is allocated to providing cybersecurity services to local 28 governments. 29 Sec. 15. DEPARTMENT OF MANAGEMENT ââ INFORMATION TECHNOLOGY 30 ââ REVOLVING AND INTERNAL FUNDS. 31 1. There is appropriated to the department of management 32 for the fiscal year beginning July 1, 2025, and ending June 33 30, 2026, from the revolving funds designated in chapter 8, 34 subchapter XI , and from internal service funds created under 35 -12- LSB 1000YC (7) 91 sc/ns 12/ 20 H.F. _____ section 8.92, such amounts as the department deems necessary 1 for the operation of the department pursuant to and consistent 2 with the requirements of chapter 8, subchapter XI . 3 2. a. Notwithstanding section 321A.3, subsection 1 , for the 4 fiscal year beginning July 1, 2025, and ending June 30, 2026, 5 the first $750,000 collected and transferred to the treasurer 6 of state with respect to the fees for transactions involving 7 the furnishing of a certified abstract of a vehicle operating 8 record under section 321A.3, subsection 1 , shall be transferred 9 to the IowAccess revolving fund created in section 8.90 for 10 the purposes of developing, implementing, maintaining, and 11 expanding electronic access to government records as provided 12 by law. 13 b. All fees collected with respect to transactions 14 involving IowAccess shall be deposited in the IowAccess 15 revolving fund created under section 8.90 and shall be used 16 only for the support of IowAccess projects. 17 Sec. 16. DEPARTMENT OF MANAGEMENT ââ ROAD USE TAX 18 FUND. There is appropriated from the road use tax fund created 19 in section 312.1 to the department of management for the fiscal 20 year beginning July 1, 2025, and ending June 30, 2026, the 21 following amount, or so much thereof as is necessary, to be 22 used for the purposes designated: 23 For salaries, support, maintenance, and miscellaneous 24 purposes: 25 . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . $ 56,000 26 Sec. 17. IPERS ââ GENERAL OFFICE. There is appropriated 27 from the Iowa public employeesâ retirement fund created in 28 section 97B.7 to the Iowa public employeesâ retirement system 29 for the fiscal year beginning July 1, 2025, and ending June 30 30, 2026, the following amounts, or so much thereof as is 31 necessary, to be used for the purposes designated: 32 1. For salaries, support, maintenance, and other 33 operational purposes to pay the costs of the Iowa public 34 employeesâ retirement system, and for not more than the 35 -13- LSB 1000YC (7) 91 sc/ns 13/ 20 H.F. _____ following full-time equivalent positions: 1 . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . $ 23,955,503 2 . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . FTEs 104.13 3 2. a. For a pension administrative system: 4 . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . $ 60,000,000 5 b. Notwithstanding section 8.33, moneys appropriated in 6 this subsection that remain unencumbered or unobligated at the 7 close of the fiscal year shall not revert but shall remain 8 available for expenditure for the purposes designated until the 9 close of the fiscal year that begins July 1, 2035. 10 Sec. 18. IOWA PUBLIC INFORMATION BOARD. There is 11 appropriated from the general fund of the state to the Iowa 12 public information board for the fiscal year beginning July 13 1, 2025, and ending June 30, 2026, the following amount, or 14 so much thereof as is necessary, to be used for the purposes 15 designated: 16 For salaries, support, maintenance, and miscellaneous 17 purposes, and for not more than the following full-time 18 equivalent positions: 19 . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . $ 467,227 20 . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . FTEs 4.20 21 Sec. 19. DEPARTMENT OF REVENUE. 22 1. There is appropriated from the general fund of the state 23 to the department of revenue for the fiscal year beginning July 24 1, 2025, and ending June 30, 2026, the following amounts, or 25 so much thereof as is necessary, to be used for the purposes 26 designated: 27 a. For salaries, support, maintenance, and miscellaneous 28 purposes, and for not more than the following full-time 29 equivalent positions: 30 . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . $ 15,378,678 31 . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . FTEs 166.66 32 b. From the moneys appropriated in this subsection, the 33 department shall use $400,000 to pay the direct costs of 34 compliance related to the collection and distribution of local 35 -14- LSB 1000YC (7) 91 sc/ns 14/ 20 H.F. _____ sales and services taxes imposed pursuant to chapter 423B . 1 2. The director of revenue shall prepare and issue a state 2 appraisal manual and the revisions to the state appraisal 3 manual as provided in section 421.17, subsection 17 , without 4 cost to a city or county. 5 Sec. 20. DEPARTMENT OF REVENUE ââ MOTOR VEHICLE FUEL TAX 6 FUND. There is appropriated from the motor vehicle fuel tax 7 fund created pursuant to section 452A.77 to the department of 8 revenue for the fiscal year beginning July 1, 2025, and ending 9 June 30, 2026, the following amount, or so much thereof as is 10 necessary, to be used for the purposes designated: 11 For salaries, support, maintenance, and miscellaneous 12 purposes, and for administration and enforcement of the 13 provisions of chapter 452A and the motor vehicle fuel tax 14 program: 15 . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . $ 1,305,775 16 Sec. 21. SECRETARY OF STATE. There is appropriated from 17 the general fund of the state to the office of the secretary of 18 state for the fiscal year beginning July 1, 2025, and ending 19 June 30, 2026, the following amounts, or so much thereof as is 20 necessary, to be used for the purposes designated: 21 1. ADMINISTRATION AND ELECTIONS 22 a. For salaries, support, maintenance, and miscellaneous 23 purposes, and for not more than the following full-time 24 equivalent positions: 25 . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . $ 2,566,697 26 . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . FTEs 19.25 27 b. The state department or agency that provides data 28 processing services to support voter registration file 29 maintenance and storage shall provide those services without 30 charge. 31 2. BUSINESS SERVICES 32 For salaries, support, maintenance, and miscellaneous 33 purposes, and for not more than the following full-time 34 equivalent positions: 35 -15- LSB 1000YC (7) 91 sc/ns 15/ 20 H.F. _____ . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . $ 1,568,795 1 . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . FTEs 16.75 2 Sec. 22. SECRETARY OF STATE ââ ADDRESS CONFIDENTIALITY 3 PROGRAM REVOLVING FUND. There is appropriated from the address 4 confidentiality program revolving fund created in section 9.8 5 to the office of the secretary of state for the fiscal year 6 beginning July 1, 2025, and ending June 30, 2026, the following 7 amount, or so much thereof as is necessary, to be used for the 8 purposes designated: 9 For salaries, support, maintenance, and miscellaneous 10 purposes: 11 . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . $ 195,400 12 Sec. 23. SECRETARY OF STATE FILING FEES REFUND. 13 Notwithstanding the obligation to collect fees pursuant to the 14 provisions of section 489.122, subsection 1 , paragraphs âcâ and 15 âsâ, section 490.122, subsection 1 , paragraph âaâ, and section 16 504.113, subsection 1 , paragraphs âaâ, âcâ, âdâ, âjâ, âkâ, 17 âlâ, and âmâ, for the fiscal year beginning July 1, 2025, the 18 secretary of state may refund these fees to the filer pursuant 19 to rules established by the secretary of state. The decision 20 of the secretary of state not to issue a refund under rules 21 established by the secretary of state is final and not subject 22 to review pursuant to chapter 17A . 23 Sec. 24. TREASURER OF STATE. 24 1. There is appropriated from the general fund of the 25 state to the office of treasurer of state for the fiscal year 26 beginning July 1, 2025, and ending June 30, 2026, the following 27 amount, or so much thereof as is necessary, to be used for the 28 purposes designated: 29 For salaries, support, maintenance, and miscellaneous 30 purposes, and for not more than the following full-time 31 equivalent positions: 32 . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . $ 1,046,415 33 . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . FTEs 28.00 34 2. The office of treasurer of state shall supply 35 -16- LSB 1000YC (7) 91 sc/ns 16/ 20 H.F. _____ administrative support for the executive council. 1 Sec. 25. TREASURER OF STATE ââ ROAD USE TAX FUND. There 2 is appropriated from the road use tax fund created in section 3 312.1 to the office of treasurer of state for the fiscal year 4 beginning July 1, 2025, and ending June 30, 2026, the following 5 amount, or so much thereof as is necessary, to be used for the 6 purposes designated: 7 For enterprise resource management costs related to the 8 distribution of road use tax fund moneys: 9 . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . $ 316,788 10 Sec. 26. IOWA UTILITIES COMMISSION. 11 1. There is appropriated from the commerce revolving fund 12 created in section 546.12 to the Iowa utilities commission for 13 the fiscal year beginning July 1, 2025, and ending June 30, 14 2026, the following amount, or so much thereof as is necessary, 15 to be used for the purposes designated: 16 For salaries, support, maintenance, and miscellaneous 17 purposes, and for not more than the following full-time 18 equivalent positions: 19 . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . $ 11,659,071 20 . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . FTEs 80.00 21 2. The utilities commission may expend additional moneys, 22 including moneys for additional personnel, if those additional 23 expenditures are actual expenses which exceed the moneys 24 budgeted for utility regulation and the expenditures are fully 25 reimbursable. Before the commission expends or encumbers an 26 amount in excess of the moneys budgeted for regulation, the 27 commission shall first do all of the following: 28 a. Notify the department of management, the legislative 29 services agency, and the legislative fiscal committee of the 30 need for the expenditures. 31 b. File with each of the entities named in paragraph âaâ the 32 legislative and regulatory justification for the expenditures, 33 along with an estimate of the expenditures. 34 Sec. 27. CHARGES ââ IOWA UTILITIES COMMISSION AND 35 -17- LSB 1000YC (7) 91 sc/ns 17/ 20 H.F. _____ DEPARTMENT OF INSURANCE AND FINANCIAL SERVICES. The Iowa 1 utilities commission and each division of the department of 2 insurance and financial services shall include in its charges 3 assessed or revenues generated an amount sufficient to cover 4 the amount stated in its appropriation and any state-assessed 5 indirect costs determined by the department of administrative 6 services. 7 Sec. 28. IOWA PRODUCTS. As a condition of receiving an 8 appropriation, any agency appropriated moneys pursuant to this 9 Act shall give first preference when purchasing a product to an 10 Iowa product or a product produced by an Iowa-based business. 11 Second preference shall be given to a United States product or 12 a product produced by a business based in the United States. 13 Sec. 29. LIMITATION OF STANDING APPROPRIATION. 14 Notwithstanding the standing appropriation in the following 15 designated section for the fiscal year beginning July 1, 2025, 16 and ending June 30, 2026, the amount appropriated from the 17 general fund of the state pursuant to that section for the 18 following designated purpose shall not exceed the following 19 amount: 20 For the enforcement of chapter 453D relating to tobacco 21 product manufacturers under section 453D.8 : 22 . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . $ 17,525 23 DIVISION II 24 CAPTIVE INSURANCE REGULATORY AND SUPERVISION FUND ââ CAPTIVE 25 COMPANY PREMIUM TAXES 26 Sec. 30. Section 432.1A, Code 2025, is amended by adding the 27 following new subsection: 28 NEW SUBSECTION . 8. The tax receipts collected pursuant 29 to this section shall be deposited in the captive insurance 30 regulatory and supervision fund created in section 521J.12. 31 Sec. 31. Section 521J.12, subsection 2, Code 2025, is 32 amended to read as follows: 33 2. All fees, assessments, fines, and administrative 34 penalties collected under this chapter and all premium tax 35 -18- LSB 1000YC (7) 91 sc/ns 18/ 20 H.F. _____ receipts collected under section 432.1A shall be deposited in 1 the fund. 2 DIVISION III 3 PROFESSIONAL LICENSURE FEE STANDARDIZATION 4 Sec. 32. DEPARTMENT OF INSPECTIONS, APPEALS, AND LICENSING 5 ââ PROFESSIONAL LICENSURE FEE STANDARDIZATION. 6 1. The department of inspections, appeals, and licensing 7 shall consult with the boards, commissions, committees, 8 councils, and other entities of state government identified in 9 the licensure renewal and fee study issued by the department of 10 inspections, appeals, and licensing pursuant to 2024 Iowa Acts, 11 chapter 1170, sections 67 and 68, to propose uniform licensure 12 fees for each license in a tier. 13 2. Not later than eighteen months after the effective date 14 of this division of this Act, the department of inspections, 15 appeals, and licensing shall submit a regulatory analysis of 16 proposed rules to the administrative code editor pursuant 17 to section 17A.4A, subsection 4, as necessary to implement 18 a uniform licensure fee proposed for licenses in applicable 19 tiers, provided the department or an entity under the purview 20 of the department is otherwise authorized by law to determine 21 the fee by rule. 22 3. For purposes of this section, âlicenseâ means a license, 23 permit, or certification. 24